North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-35.1 Regional Public Health Networks

23-35.1-01.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

The definitions of section 23-35-01 apply; and

“Regional public health network” means a group of public health units that have entered a joint powers agreement and have been verified by the state health officer as meeting the requirements of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1; 2013, ch. 217, § 8.

23-35.1-02.
Regional public health network — Joint powers agreement — Review by state health officer — Criteria.

Before a group of public health units may be designated as a regional public health network and eligible for state funding, the state health officer shall review the joint powers agreement the public health units entered and verify that:

The regional public health network consists of:

At least two public health units serving a minimum population of fifteen thousand; or

A minimum of three public health units.

The joint powers agreement requires that the participating public health units:

Assess the health of the population;

Identify workplan activities that meet the needs of the region;

Comply with requirements adopted by the health council by rule;

Meet department maintenance of effort funding requirements, which must be calculated based on each unit’s dollar or mill levy public health unit contribution in the most recent calendar year; and

Share core public health activities and measure outcomes in accordance with subsection 3.

The joint powers agreement requires:

Evidence that network activities align with prevailing health status and community needs;

Shared or expanded services, including the core public health activities of:

Preventing epidemics and spread of disease;

Protecting against environmental hazards;

Preventing injuries;

Promoting health behaviors;

Responding to disasters; and

Assuring the quality and accessibility of health services;

Assurance of network performance measurement to demonstrate capacity, process, or health outcomes;

Criteria for the future participation of public health units that were not parties to the original joint powers agreement;

An application process by which public health units that were not parties to the original joint powers agreement may become participating districts; and

A process by which public health units that were not parties to the original joint powers agreement may appeal a decision to deny an application to participate in the agreement to the state health officer.

The joint powers agreement provides for the structure of the governing body of the network.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1; 2013, ch. 217, § 9.

23-35.1-03.
Regional public health network — Annual plan.

A regional public health network shall prepare an annual plan regarding the provision of the core public health activities and shall submit the plan to the state health officer for approval.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1; 2013, ch. 217, § 10.

23-35.1-04.
Regional public health networks — Receipt and use of moneys.

The board of a regional public health network may receive and expend moneys for the provision of core public health activities and any other lawful activities.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1; 2013, ch. 217, § 11.

23-35.1-05.
Compensation — Reimbursement — Extraordinary service.

The board of a regional public health network may provide compensation and reimbursement to any board member who, at the direction of the board, performs extraordinary service on behalf of the board. For purposes of this section, “extraordinary service” means duties beyond those reasonably expected of members of the board and includes travel to and attendance at national meetings or conventions.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 225, § 1.